Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1

Polling Places

2-3-101. Polling places — Designation — Relocation.

All elections shall be held in polling places designated by the county election commission.

Each polling place shall be in the precinct it is to serve except for municipal elections not held in conjunction with:

Any primary election;

The regular August or November general elections;

Any special primary or special general election for state or federal offices; or

The presidential preference primary.

Where a municipal election is not held in conjunction with an election specified in subdivision (a)(2)(A) and if a polling place is located outside of the boundaries of a municipality but the precinct the polling place serves includes residents of the municipality, the county election commission may designate a polling place outside, but closest to the geographic precinct within the limits of the municipality, of the precinct it is to serve. The county election commission may, upon request from a municipality, consolidate one (1) or more polling places, from one (1) or more precincts, within the limits of the municipality.

Immediately after the consolidation of one (1) or more polling places, from one (1) or more precincts within the limits of the municipality, the county election commission shall publish a notice of the consolidation in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The county election commission shall mail to each active voter whose polling place is affected, a notice of the new polling place and the precinct number. The county election commission shall give written notification of the consolidation to the office of local government, comptroller of the treasury.

If a county election commission determines that there is no place within a precinct which meets the requirements of this title for polling places, it shall designate the nearest available and suitable place no more than one half (½) mile from the precinct boundary as the polling place except in an emergency. If no accessible polling place is available within the precinct, or, within the one-half (½) mile limit outside the precinct, with the approval of the state coordinator of elections, the county election commission may designate a suitable place within three (3) miles.

No polling place location may be changed within ten (10) days of an election except in an emergency.

In any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population greater than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, if space is available, no more than one (1) polling place for a precinct may be located in the same room.

At least thirty (30) days before a polling place is relocated, the county election commission shall mail a notice of intent to relocate to the elected officials representing the affected area. Such notice of intent shall be mailed to the candidates before the time the voters are notified of the change as provided in § 2-3-105. The provisions of this subdivision (b)(2) shall only apply to any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population greater than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if a municipality is located within two (2) or more counties of the state, then the county election commissions of each respective county may, by written mutual agreement of the counties, designate one (1) polling place outside the boundaries of one (1) of the respective counties; provided, that the polling place is located within the limits of the municipality and within five hundred feet (500') of the county boundary line. Voters residing within the precinct are authorized to vote at the polling place established by the county election commissions in accordance with this subsection (c).

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-301; Acts 1989, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 558, § 6; 2012, ch. 995, § 1; 2014, ch. 488, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 697, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2013, ch. 372, §§ 1, 2 purported to amend subsection (a) of this section. However, it was determined that Senate Bill No. 1320 and House Bill 1208, assigned as Public Chapter No. 372, did not pass both houses in the same form, as required by Tenn. Const., art. II, § 18 and, therefore, the act was not codified. The section set out above does not reflect the amendments by that act.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment by ch. 488, in (a), redesignated the former introductory clause of (2) as present (2)(A), redesignated former (2)(B)-(D) as present (2)(A)(i)-(iv), rewrote and designated the continuation paragraph as present (2)(B), added (2)(C), and added “except in an emergency” at the end of the first sentence in (3).

The 2014 amendment by ch. 697 added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 488, § 3. February 13, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 697, § 3. April 15, 2014.

Cross-References. Boundaries of voting precincts, §3-1-103.

2-3-102. Precincts — Establishment, consolidation, or change of boundaries.

No voting precinct shall be established, created, consolidated, divided, or the boundaries otherwise altered unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction, by reason of an annexation or other change in the boundary of a county or municipality, or in accordance with subsection (b). Any precinct boundary that is altered in accordance with this subsection (a) shall coincide with a census block as designated by the United States census bureau in the latest federal decennial census.

The county election commission may establish, consolidate, or change the boundaries of precincts whenever the public convenience or law requires it; provided, that if any precinct boundary is altered pursuant to this subsection (b) then all of the following conditions must be met:

Any precinct boundary that is altered shall coincide with a census block as designated by the United States census bureau in the latest federal decennial census; and

After December 31, 2018, all precinct boundaries within the jurisdiction of the county election commission that do not coincide with a census block as designated by the United States census bureau in the latest federal decennial census shall be altered so that the precinct boundaries do coincide with a census block as designated by the United States census bureau in the latest federal decennial census.

Any county election commission that alters the boundaries of any voting precinct in accordance with this section shall send a map, or geographic information systems file, to the office of local government which clearly delineates the new boundaries of the voting precinct.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-302; Acts 1984, ch. 951, § 1; 1991, ch. 373, § 1; 1993, ch. 362, § 1; 1999, ch. 421, §§ 1-5; 2011, ch. 46, §§ 1-4; 2018, ch. 581, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1982, ch. 900, § 49 and ch. 944, § 4 each provide that notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, the county election commission shall make such changes in the boundaries of precincts as may be necessitated by those acts (which changed the description of several state representative districts described in §3-1-103) prior to any election held after the effective dates (April 4, 1982 and May 19, 1982) of those acts.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a)(1) After May 16, 1991, no voting precinct shall be established, created, consolidated, divided or the boundaries otherwise altered unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction, by reason of an annexation or other change in the boundary of a county or municipality or in accordance with subdivision (a)(2). Any boundary which is altered in accordance with this subdivision (a)(1) shall coincide with a census block, tract, municipal or county boundary as designated on United States bureau of the census maps prepared for the 1990 federal decennial census. After phase 2 maps for a county under the block boundary suggestion program of the bureau of the census for Census 2000 are submitted to the bureau of the census by the office of local government, any precinct boundary in such county which is altered in accordance with this subdivision (a)(1) shall coincide with a census block, tract, municipal or county boundary as designated on United States bureau of the census maps prepared for the 2000 federal decennial census. After March 1, 2011, any precinct boundary in such county that is altered in accordance with this subdivision (a)(1) shall coincide with a census block, tract, municipal, or county boundary as designated on United States bureau of the census maps prepared for the 2010 federal decennial census.”(2) The county election commission may establish, consolidate or change the boundaries of precincts whenever the public convenience or law requires it; provided, that if any precinct boundary is altered pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2) then all of the following conditions must be met:”(A) Any boundary which is altered in accordance with this subdivision (a)(2)(A) shall coincide with a census block, tract, municipal or county boundary as designated on United States bureau of the census maps prepared for the 1990 federal decennial census; provided, that after phase 2 maps for a county under the block boundary suggestion program of the bureau of the census for Census 2000 are submitted to the bureau of the census by the office of local government, any precinct boundary in such county which is altered in accordance with this subdivision (a)(2) shall coincide with a census block, tract, municipal or county boundary as designated on United States bureau of the census maps prepared for the 2000 federal decennial census; provided, further, that after March 1, 2011, any precinct boundary in such county that is altered in accordance with this subdivision (a)(2) shall coincide with a census block, tract, municipal, or county boundary as designated on United States bureau of the census maps prepared for the 2010 federal decennial census; and”(B) All precinct boundaries within the jurisdiction of such county election commission that do not coincide with a census block, tract, municipal or county boundary as designated on United States bureau of the census maps prepared for the 1990 federal decennial census shall be altered so that such boundaries do coincide with a census block, tract, municipal or county boundary as designated on United States bureau of the census maps prepared for the 1990 federal decennial census; provided, that after phase 2 maps for a county under the block boundary suggestion program of the bureau of the census for Census 2000 are submitted to the bureau of the census by the office of local government, any precinct boundary in such county which is altered in accordance with this subdivision (a)(2) shall coincide with a census block, tract, municipal or county boundary as designated on United States bureau of the census maps prepared for the 2000 federal decennial census; provided, further, that after March 1, 2011, any precinct boundary in such county that is altered in accordance with this subdivision (a)(2) shall coincide with a census block, tract, municipal, or county boundary as designated on United States bureau of the census maps prepared for the 2010 federal decennial census.“(3) Any political subdivision which alters the boundaries of any voting precinct in accordance with this subsection (a) shall send a map to the office of local government and to the office of management information services for the general assembly, which map shall clearly show the new boundaries of such voting precinct.“(4) All census descriptions, census delineations, census district lines and other census designations as used in this subsection (a) are those established for and by the United States bureau of the census for taking either the 1990, 2000 or 2010 federal decennial census in Tennessee.“(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a)(2) to the contrary, a precinct boundary established, consolidated or changed pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) may coincide with a line which divides a census block if:“(1) The line splitting the census block was approved by the United States bureau of the census and population was allocated between the areas split by such line pursuant to the fee paid block split program of such bureau; and“(2) In addition to the maps required to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a)(3), the allocation of population for any split block is also sent to the office of local government and to the office of management information services for the general assembly.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 581, § 4. March 16, 2018.

Cross-References. Changes in state representative district precincts, §3-1-103.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Eugene Puett), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1335 (1961).

2-3-103. Maximum size of precincts.

Precincts where voting machines are used shall, whenever practicable, in the judgment of the county election commission, after taking into consideration all facts and circumstances, be limited in size to a maximum of six thousand (6,000) registered voters.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1974, ch. 413, § 1; 1974, ch. 676, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-303; Acts 1991, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 558, § 7; 2012, ch. 1101, § 2.

2-3-104. Ratio of number of voters to voting machines.

Where voting machines are used, there shall be, as nearly as practicable, no more than one thousand (1,000) registered voters per voting machine.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-304; Acts 1997, ch. 558, § 1; 2002, ch. 698, § 2; 2006, ch. 642, § 2.

2-3-105. Publication of changes in precinct boundaries — Notice to affected voters and office of local government.

Immediately after any alteration of precinct boundaries or change of district, the county election commission shall publish the changed boundaries in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The county election commission shall mail to each active voter whose polling place is changed a notice of the voter's new polling place and precinct number. Furthermore, immediately after any alteration of precinct boundaries, the county election commission shall give written notification of such changes to the office of local government, comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-305; Acts 1980, ch. 675, § 1; 2006, ch. 642, § 1; 2008, ch. 928, § 7.

Cross-References. Newspaper of general circulation defined, §2-1-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, §§ 6, 11.

2-3-106. Description of boundaries — Filing and recordation — Availability to general assembly.

The boundaries of each precinct shall be described either by metes and bounds or by a map of sufficient detail to delineate the boundaries of the precinct. Copies of the maps shall be filed and recorded in the office of the clerk of the county legislative body and in the office of the coordinator of elections and shall be available for public inspection.

Copies of the maps shall be made available by the coordinator of elections to members of the general assembly upon request and upon payment of the actual cost of reproduction of the same.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1977, ch. 155, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 2-306; Acts 1981, ch. 478, § 8.

2-3-107. Polling places — Physical requirements — Use of public buildings — Rentals for private buildings.

The county election commission shall designate as polling places only rooms which have adequate heat, light, space and other facilities, including a sufficient number of electrical outlets where voting machines are used, for the comfortable and orderly conduct of elections.

The commission shall, insofar as practicable, arrange for the use of public schools and other public buildings for polling places on election day and during the early voting period.

If the county election commission has arranged for the use of a public school or a public charter school as a polling place for a regular November election, as defined in § 2-1-104, then the LEA or the public charter school, respectively, shall be closed for instruction on the election day. The LEA or the public charter school may use the day as an in-service day for school personnel.

An LEA or public charter school may choose to be open or closed for instruction on election days other than days on which a regular November election occurs. If an LEA or public charter school chooses to close on an election day, then the LEA or public charter school may use the day as an in-service day for school personnel.

Before adopting a calendar for a school year, each LEA and public charter school shall consult with the county election commission as to the elections that are scheduled to be conducted during the school year for which the calendar is to be adopted.

Upon application of the commission, the authority which has the control of any building or grounds supported by taxation under the laws of this state shall make available the necessary space for the purpose of holding elections and adequate space for the storage of voting machines without charge. A reasonable sum may be paid for necessary extra janitor service. If a state park is to be used as a voting location, the park must establish the site for the polling place at least one (1) year prior to the date of the election, and the location of the polling site within the park may not change without the consent of the county election committee.

When polling places are established in private buildings, the commission may pay a reasonable rental.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-312; Acts 2001, ch. 413, § 6; 2013, ch. 231, § 3; 2018, ch. 867, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (b)(1)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 867, § 2. January 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Convenient voting centers, title 2, chapter 3, part 3.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

2-3-108. Polling places — Tables and chairs for officials — Voting compartments — Supplies.

The county election commission shall arrange for each polling place to have a sufficient number of tables and chairs for its election officials and poll watchers and voting compartments for the convenient use of voters in marking paper ballots.

Each compartment shall be so arranged that it is impossible for any person to see a voter's ballot while it is being marked. The arrangement shall be such that neither the ballot boxes nor the voting compartments are hidden from the view of the election officials and poll watchers or those just outside a guard rail which may run in front of the ballot box.

The number of such voting compartments shall not be less than three (3) for every one hundred (100) voters registered to vote at a polling place where voting machines are not used.

One (1) voting compartment shall be provided at each polling place where voting machines are used.

Each voting machine shall be so placed that it is accessible to only one (1) voter at a time and is in full view of all the election officials and watchers at the polling place.

The county election commission shall provide for each polling place a sufficient supply of pencils, voting instructions, and boundary signs to be placed at the boundary provided in § 2-7-111. The flag of the United States shall be displayed outside of each polling place on election day. The county election commission shall ensure that such flag is available for each polling place.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-313; Acts 1987, ch. 362, § 3.

Cross-References. Ballots and supplies, title 2, ch. 5, part 2.

Desecration of venerate object, §39-17-311.

2-3-109. Voters with disabilities and elderly voters.

Pursuant to the provisions of Public Law 98-435 of the 98th Congress, it is the legislative intent, by enactment of this legislation, to improve access for elderly voters and voters with disabilities to registration facilities and polling places.

For the purposes of this section:

“Elderly voter” means any voter sixty (60) years of age or older; and

“Voter with a disability” or “voters with disabilities” means any person or persons whose disability meets the definition of a disability as defined by the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12131 et seq.

Every building which houses a county election commission office shall be accessible to elderly voters and voters with disabilities by construction of ramps or other appropriate means.

All voting precincts shall be made accessible to elderly voters and voters with disabilities, unless the state election commission and state election coordinator shall, in their sole discretion, determine that the precinct cannot reasonably be made accessible to the elderly voters and voters with disabilities.

Each county election commission shall furnish to the coordinator of elections, at the coordinator of election's request, a listing setting forth which polling places in the county are accessible and which are not. If a building suitable for use as a polling place which is accessible is available, such building shall be designated as the polling place for that voting precinct.

Not later than forty-five (45) days before any election, the county election commission shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation a notice advising any elderly voter or voter with a disability that if such voter's polling place is inaccessible, such voter has the right to vote early by absentee ballot or at the election commission office on election day.

Elderly voters or voters with disabilities assigned to vote in precincts wherein the polling place is not accessible may vote at the election commission office on election day. Such voter shall complete an affidavit at the election commission office stating that such voter's designated voting location, to the best of the voter's knowledge, does not comply with Public Law 98-435 of the 98th Congress. The affidavit must be received by the county election commission not less than ten (10) days prior to the first election in which the elderly voter or voter with a disability plans to vote at the election commission office on election day. The election commission shall maintain a record of all affidavits completed pursuant to this subsection (e) and shall not require a voter to complete more than one (1) such affidavit unless the voter's precinct changes from the precinct cited in the affidavit on file. Upon receipt of such affidavit, the administrator of elections shall remove the voter's duplicate permanent registration card from the precinct binder and place the same in an alphabetical book to be used at the election office on election day. The election commission may allow persons voting hereunder to vote on paper ballot or on voting machines, in the discretion of the voting commission.

As an alternative to voting at the election commission office on election day, an elderly voter or voter with a disability assigned to vote in a precinct where the polling place is inaccessible may vote by absentee ballot or during the early voting period subject to the provisions of § 2-2-115(b)(7).

Each county election commission shall be responsible for notifying the officer of election on election day of any elderly voter or voter with a disability who votes at the election commission office.

The state election coordinator shall ensure that each county election commission takes the necessary steps to notify the voting precinct of the elderly voter or voter with a disability of the filing of the voter's affidavit for future elections.

The state election coordinator shall ensure that each county election commission takes the necessary steps and secures adequate facilities and supplies to carry out the requirements of this section.

All the rights given and provisions made under this section are in addition to any voting rights or procedures which already are in existence relative to elderly voters or voters with disabilities, and no provision or part hereof shall be deemed to restrict or diminish any such rights or procedures.

Acts 1985, ch. 72, §§ 1-9; 1991, ch. 184, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 859, § 7; 1996, ch. 617, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 756, §§ 4, 5; 2004, ch. 480, §§ 2, 3; 2007, ch. 48, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 724, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Public Law 98-435, referred to in this section, is known as the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act, and is codified as 42 U.S.C. 1973ee et seq.

References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “sixty (60) years of age” for “sixty-five (65) years of age” in (b)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 724, § 12. April 16, 2014.

Cross-References. Early voting, title 2, ch. 6, part 1.

Newspaper of general circulation defined, §2-1-104.

2-3-110. Procedures when emergency necessitates change to polling place location within 10 days of election day.

As used in this chapter, “emergency” means an occurrence, or threat thereof, whether natural, technological, or manmade, in war or in peace, that results in a polling place being unavailable or unsuitable for voting. A natural threat includes disease, outbreaks, and epidemics.

Notwithstanding anything in this chapter to the contrary, a county election commission shall use the following procedures when an emergency necessitates a change to a polling place location within ten (10) days of an election day:

A county election commission shall not change a polling place without approval of the coordinator of elections;

If no alternative suitable site is available within a precinct, the county election commission may create emergency supersites by moving a polling place that is unavailable or unsuitable due to an emergency to another polling place in the county. To the extent practicable, the county election commission should choose the nearest available and suitable polling place;

The county election commission may designate the county election commission office or other centrally located site or sites for voting by any voter in the county;

The county election commission shall provide notice of any changes as widely as possible under the circumstances, including, but not limited to, the media, county election commission website if the county maintains a website, secretary of state's website, and if possible, signage at each affected polling place.

Acts 2020, ch. 655, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 655, § 7. April 2, 2020.

Cross-References. Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, title 58, ch. 2, part 4.

Emergency management powers of the governor, §58-2-107.